Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3509.03
Homesteads; exemptions; property tax statement; contents.

All property tax statements for homesteads granted an exemption in sections 77-3507 to 77-3509 shall show the amount of the exemption, the tax that would otherwise be due, and a statement that the tax loss shall be reimbursed by the state as a homestead exemption.

Laws 1984, LB 956, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 84, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 9, § 3.